Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2925
Department of Correctional Services; Department of Health and Human Services; duties; evaluation of offender.

Within sixty days of the date of commitment to the Department of Correctional Services of a convicted sex offender to serve his or her sentence, the Department of Health and Human Services shall conduct an evaluation of the offender for purposes of determining whether treatment in a treatment program operated by the Department of Health and Human Services is appropriate for the offender. The evaluation process shall be based upon criteria and procedures established by the Department of Health and Human Services. The Department of Correctional Services shall provide the Department of Health and Human Services access to all correctional and presentence records determined by the Department of Health and Human Services to be relevant to the evaluation process.

Laws 1992, LB 523, § 4;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 79.